Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1266.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 1-301, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE1-301. Holidays enumerated A. The following days shall be holidays: 1. Sunday of each week. 2. January 1, "New Year's Day". 3. Third Monday in January, "Martin Luther King, Jr./Civil Rights Day". 4. Third Monday in February, "Lincoln/Washington Presidents' Day". 5. March 31, "Cesar Chavez day". 6. April 1, "dolores huerta Day". 5. 7. Second Sunday in May, "Mothers' Day". 6. 8. Last Monday in May, "Memorial Day". 7. 9. June 2, "Native American Day". 8. 10. Third Sunday in June, "Fathers' Day". 9. 11. July 4, "Independence Day". 10. 12. First Sunday in August, "American Family Day". 11. 13. August 14, "National Navajo Code Talkers Day". 12. 14. First Monday in September, "Labor Day". 13. 15. September 17, "Constitution Commemoration Day". 14. 16. Second Monday in October, "Columbus Day". 15. 17. November 11, "Veterans' Day". 16. 18. Fourth Thursday in November, "Thanksgiving Day". 17. 19. December 25, "Christmas Day". B. When any of the holidays enumerated in subsection A of this section falls on a Sunday, the following Monday shall be observed as a holiday, with the exception of the holidays enumerated in subsection A, paragraphs 1, 5, 7, 8  9, 10, 11 12, and 13 and 15 of this section. C. When any of the holidays enumerated in subsection A, paragraphs 2, 5, 9  6, 11, 15 and 17 and 19 of this section falls on a Saturday, the preceding Friday shall be observed as a holiday. D. When the holiday enumerated in subsection A, paragraph 7  9 of this section falls on a day other than Sunday, the Sunday following June 2 shall be observed as that holiday. E. When the holiday enumerated in subsection A, paragraph 11 13 of this section falls on a day other than Sunday, the Sunday following August 14 shall be observed as that holiday. F. When the holiday enumerated in subsection A, paragraph 13 15 of this section falls on a day other than Sunday, the Sunday preceding September 17 shall be observed as that holiday. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Repeal Section 1-308, Arizona Revised Statutes, is repealed.